Vermont, session 2025-2026, H374.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 385 is amended to read:
§ 385. ADMINISTRATION
The Commissioner and the Commissioner’s authorized representatives have
full power and authority for all the following:
* * *
(5) To recommend a suitable scale of rates for learners, and apprentices,
and persons with disabilities, which may be less than the regular minimum
wage rate for experienced workers without disabilities.
VT LEG #380216 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.374
2025 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380216 v.1